Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1661
Complaint; Chief Water Officer; duties; unsafe condition; modification.

(1) Upon receipt of a written complaint alleging that the person or property of the complainant is endangered by the construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of any dam, the Chief Water Officer shall cause an inspection and investigation to be made unless the data, records, and inspection reports on file are found adequate to make a determination whether the complaint is valid. The complainant shall be provided with a copy of the official report of the inspection and investigation.

(2) If it is found that an unsafe condition exists, the Chief Water Officer shall notify the owner of the dam to take such action as is necessary to correct the condition, including breaching or removal of any dam found to be beyond repair.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 61;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 299.